North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160. Municipal Corporations.
§§ 160-1 through 160-521.
[Repealed]

Repealed and transferred.

Editor’s Note.

Most of the sections of this Chapter were repealed by one of the following acts: Session Laws 1945, c. 1052; Session Laws 1949, c. 1081; Session Laws 1953, c. 901, s. 3; Session Laws 1955, c. 698; Session Laws 1957, c. 863, s. 1; Session Laws 1963, c. 406, s. 1; Session Laws 1967, c. 826; Session Laws 1969, c. 629, s. 1; Session Laws 1969, c. 870; Session Laws 1969, c. 1003, s. 9; Session Laws 1969, c. 1010, s. 6; Session Laws 1969, c. 1065, s. 1; Session Laws 1971, c. 698, s. 2; and Session Laws 1971, c. 780, ss. 10 to 19.

The balance of the sections of the Chapter were transferred to Chapters 153 or 160A by Session Laws 1971, c. 698, ss. 3 and 4; Session Laws 1971, c. 896, ss. 4, 6, 7, 9 and 13; Session Laws 1973, c. 426, ss. 7, 74 and 75; and Session Laws 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1247, ss. 44 and 45.

For provisions as to counties, see now Chapter 153A. For provisions as to cities and towns, see now Chapter 160A.